Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 37.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-4814
Organ and tissue
donations; legislative findings; protocol; development.

The
Legislature finds that the availability of donor organs and tissue can save
the lives and restore the health and productivity of many Nebraskans. Every
hospital in the state shall develop a protocol, appropriate to the hospital's
capability, for identifying and referring potential donor organ and tissue
availability in coordination
with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act. The protocol shall
require utmost care and sensitivity to the family's circumstances, views,
and beliefs in all discussions regarding donation of organs or tissue. Hospitals
shall be required to consult with existing organ and tissue agencies preparatory
to establishing a staff training and education program in the protocol. This section and section 71-4816 are
for the immediate preservation of the public health and welfare.

Laws 1987, LB 74, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 37.

Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, see section 71-4824.